Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10H-212] Disclosure; riders and
endorsements. (a) Except for riders or endorsements by which the insurer
effectuates a request made in writing by the insured under an individual
long-term care insurance policy, all riders or endorsements added to an
individual long-term care insurance policy after the date of issue or at
reinstatement or renewal that reduce or eliminate benefits or coverage in the
policy shall require signed acceptance by the individual insured.

(b) After the date of policy issuance, any
rider or endorsement that increases benefits or coverage with a concomitant
increase in premium during the policy term shall be agreed to in writing by the
insured, except if the increased benefits or coverages are required by law.

(c) Where a separate additional premium is
charged for benefits provided in connection with riders or endorsements, the
premium charge shall be set forth in the policy, rider, or endorsement. [L
1999, c 93, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next